Mississippi statutes. Title 57. Planning, Research and Development
Article 1. Delta Area Workforce Training Project [Repealed].

§§ 57-107-1 through 57-107-7.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 2009, ch. 471, § 9, as amended by Laws of 2011, ch. 480, § 39, effective July 1, 2016.

§57-107-1. [Laws, 2009, ch. 471, § 1; reenacted without change, Laws, 2011, ch. 480, § 35, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 6, 2011.)]

§57-107-3. [Laws, 2009, ch. 471, § 2; reenacted without change, Laws, 2011, ch. 480, § 36, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 6, 2011.)]

§57-107-5. [Laws, 2009, ch. 471, § 3; reenacted without change, Laws, 2011, ch. 480, § 37, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 6, 2011.)]

§57-107-7. [Laws, 2009, ch. 471, § 4; reenacted without change, Laws, 2011, ch. 480, § 38, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 6, 2011.)]